Hawaii statutes.
§26-9 Department of commerce and consumer affairs. (a) The
department of commerce and consumer affairs shall be headed by a single
executive to be known as the director of commerce and consumer affairs.

(b) The department shall
protect the interests of consumers, depositors, and investors throughout the
State. It shall set standards and enforce all laws and rules governing the
licensing and operation of, and register and supervise the conduct of, trades,
businesses, and professions, including banks, insurance companies, brokerage
firms, and other financial institutions.

(c)
The board of acupuncture, board of public accountancy, board of barbering and
cosmetology, boxing commission, board of chiropractic examiners, contractors
license board, board of dental examiners, board of electricians and plumbers,
elevator mechanics licensing board, board of professional engineers,
architects, surveyors, and landscape architects, board of massage therapy,
Hawaii medical board, motor vehicle industry licensing board, motor vehicle
repair industry board, board of naturopathic medicine, board of nursing, board
of examiners in optometry, pest control board, board of pharmacy, board of
physical therapy, board of psychology, board of private detectives and guards,
real estate commission, board of veterinary examiners, board of speech
pathology and audiology, and any board, commission, program, or entity created
pursuant to or specified by statute in furtherance of the purpose of this
section including but not limited to section 26H-4, or chapters 484, 514A,
514B, and 514E shall be placed within the department of commerce and consumer
affairs for administrative purposes.

The
public utilities commission shall be placed, for administrative purposes only,
within the department of commerce and consumer affairs. Notwithstanding
section 26-9(e), (f), (g), (h), (j), (k), (l), (m), (n), (p), (q), (r), and
(s), and except as permitted by sections 269-2 and 269-3, the department of
commerce and consumer affairs shall not direct or exert authority over the day-to-day
operations or functions of the commission.

(d) Except as otherwise
provided by this chapter, the functions, duties, and powers, subject to the
administrative control of the director of commerce and consumer affairs, and
the composition of each board and commission shall be as provided by law.

(e) Notwithstanding any
provision to the contrary, the employment, appointment, promotion, transfer,
demotion, discharge, and job descriptions of all officers and employees under
the administrative control of this department shall be determined by the
director of commerce and consumer affairs subject only to applicable personnel
laws.

(f) The director of commerce
and consumer affairs may appoint a hearings officer or officers not subject to
chapter 76 to hear and decide any case or controversy regarding licenses and
the application and enforcement of rules involving any of the boards,
commissions, or regulatory programs within the department of commerce and
consumer affairs. The hearings officer or officers shall have power to issue
subpoenas, administer oaths, hear testimony, find facts, and make conclusions
of law and a recommended decision; provided that the conclusions and decisions
shall be subject to review and redetermination by the officer, board, or
commission which would have heard the case in the first instance in the absence
of a hearings officer. The review shall be conducted in accordance with
chapter 91.

(g) The director of commerce
and consumer affairs may appoint an information officer not subject to chapter
76 who shall ensure the prompt and efficient handling of consumer inquiries and
the development of a strong consumer education program.

(h) The director may appoint
a complaints and enforcement officer not subject to chapter 76 who shall
facilitate the receipt, arbitration, investigation, prosecution, and hearing of
complaints regarding any person who furnishes commodities, services, or real
estate for which a license, registration, or certificate is required from the
department or any board, commission, or regulatory program thereunder. In
representing the State in bringing any action to enjoin unlicensed,
unregistered, or uncertified activities, the department of commerce and
consumer affairs' attorneys shall be empowered to exercise all authority
granted to the attorney general and to the director of the office of consumer
protection under sections 487-12, 487-14, 480-3.1, 480-15, 480-15.1, 480-20(c),
and 480-22, as these sections now exist and as they subsequently may be
amended. The attorneys also shall be empowered to exercise all authority
granted to the attorney general and to the responsible attorneys of the various
counties under section 92F-13 in all cases involving documents and records
within the custody or control of the regulated industries complaints office.

(i) The functions and
authority previously exercised by the treasurer (except funds custody, cash
management, debt management, and administering of veterans loans transferred to
the department of budget and finance) as constituted are transferred to the
department of commerce and consumer affairs established by this chapter.

(j) In the course of an
investigation of matters affecting the interest of consumers, depositors, or
investors, or of any other matter within the jurisdiction of the department,
the director shall have the power to subpoena witnesses, examine witnesses
under oath, and require the production of books, papers, documents, or objects
that the director deems relevant or material to the inquiry. Upon application
by the director, obedience to the subpoena may be enforced by the circuit court
in the county in which the person subpoenaed resides or is found in the same
manner as a subpoena issued by the clerk of a circuit court.

The director shall appoint
and commission one or more investigators as the exigencies of the public
service may require. Persons appointed and commissioned under this section may
serve subpoenas and serve process and orders pursuant to section 634-21.
Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to entitle persons appointed and
commissioned by the director to retirement benefits applicable to police
officers under chapter 88.

(k) The director may adopt,
amend, or repeal rules pursuant to chapter 91 to effectuate the purposes of all
laws within the jurisdiction of the department of commerce and consumer
affairs. The director's authority to adopt rules shall not modify, impair, or
otherwise affect the power of boards and commissions placed within the
department of commerce and consumer affairs for administrative purposes from
adopting, amending, or repealing rules, except as provided for in subsection
(l).

(l) Any law to the contrary
notwithstanding, the director of commerce and consumer affairs may:

(1) Establish, increase, decrease, or repeal fees
relating to any aspect of the registration, certification, licensure, or any
other administrative process for all laws within the jurisdiction of the
department. Amendments to fee assessments shall be made pursuant to chapter
91;

(2) Assess fees for copies in any form of media of
the computerized records of the business registration division or for
electronic access to the computerized information on a one-time or on-going
basis. The fees charged for the copies or access may include billing service
fees, network usage fees, and computer consultant fees. In adopting these
fees, the director shall take into account the intent to make the division
self-supporting. To this end, the fees may reflect the commercial value of the
service or information provided. In the case of requests for records by a
nonprofit organization, the director may reduce or waive the fees. This
paragraph shall control in any instance where there is a conflict between this
paragraph and any other statute; and

(3) Assess fees for copies of consumer and business
educational publications prepared or issued by the department. Fees collected
under this paragraph shall be deposited into the compliance resolution fund
under subsection (o). In the case of requests for copies by a nonprofit
organization, the director may reduce or waive the fees. For purposes of this
paragraph, "consumer and business educational publications" does not
include copies of statutes or administrative rules.

The fees collected by the
professional and vocational licensing division and the business registration
division shall be deposited into the compliance resolution fund under
subsection (o).

The director may appoint
program specialists, not subject to chapter 76, to assist with the activities
of the professional and vocational licensing division.

(m) Notwithstanding section
92-17 or any other law to the contrary, all boards, commissions, and regulatory
programs placed within the department of commerce and consumer affairs for
administrative purposes shall delegate their authority to receive, arbitrate,
investigate, and prosecute complaints to the department.

(n) Each board and
commission, as well as the director, by written order, may delegate to the executive
secretary or other personnel of the department any of its powers or duties as
it deems reasonable and proper for the administration of the licensing laws
that are within the jurisdiction of the department of commerce and consumer
affairs. The delegated powers and duties may be exercised by the executive
secretary or other personnel of the department in the name of the board,
commission, or the director. However, neither a board, a commission, nor the
director shall delegate the authority to adopt, amend, or repeal rules or take
final disciplinary action against a licensee.

(o)
Every person licensed under any chapter within the jurisdiction of the
department of commerce and consumer affairs and every person licensed subject
to chapter 485A or registered under chapter 467B shall pay upon issuance of a
license, permit, certificate, or registration a fee and a subsequent annual fee
to be determined by the director and adjusted from time to time to ensure that
the proceeds, together with all other fines, income, and penalties collected
under this section, do not surpass the annual operating costs of conducting
compliance resolution activities required under this section. The fees
may be collected biennially or pursuant to rules adopted under chapter 91, and
shall be deposited into the special fund established under this subsection.
Every filing pursuant to chapter 514E or section 485A-202(a)(26) shall be
assessed, upon initial filing and at each renewal period in which a renewal is
required, a fee that shall be prescribed by rules adopted under chapter 91, and
that shall be deposited into the special fund established under this
subsection. Any unpaid fee shall be paid by the licensed person, upon
application for renewal, restoration, reactivation, or reinstatement of a
license, and by the person responsible for the renewal, restoration,
reactivation, or reinstatement of a license, upon the application for renewal,
restoration, reactivation, or reinstatement of the license. If the fees are
not paid, the director may deny renewal, restoration, reactivation, or
reinstatement of the license. The director may establish, increase, decrease,
or repeal the fees when necessary pursuant to rules adopted under chapter 91.
The director may also increase or decrease the fees pursuant to section 92-28.

There is created in the state treasury a
special fund to be known as the compliance resolution fund to be expended by the director's
designated representatives as provided by this subsection. Notwithstanding any
law to the contrary, all revenues, fees, and fines collected by the department
shall be deposited into the compliance resolution fund. Unencumbered balances
existing on June 30, 1999, in the cable television fund under chapter 440G, the
division of consumer advocacy fund under chapter 269, the financial institution
examiners' revolving fund, section 412:2-109, the special handling fund,
section 414‑13, and unencumbered balances existing on June 30, 2002, in
the insurance regulation fund, section 431:2-215, shall be deposited into the
compliance resolution fund. This provision shall not apply to the drivers
education fund underwriters fee, sections 431:10C-115 and 431:10G-107,
insurance premium taxes and revenues, revenues of the workers' compensation
special compensation fund, section 386-151, the captive insurance
administrative fund, section 431:19-101.8, the insurance commissioner's
education and training fund, section 431:2-214, the medical malpractice
patients' compensation fund as administered under section 5 of Act 232, Session
Laws of Hawaii 1984, and fees collected for deposit in the office of consumer
protection restitution fund, section 487-14, the real estate appraisers fund,
section 466K-1, the real estate recovery fund, section 467-16, the real estate
education fund, section 467-19, the contractors recovery fund, section 444-26,
the contractors education fund, section 444-29, the condominium education trust
fund, section 514B-71, and the mortgage foreclosure dispute resolution special
fund, section 667-86. Any law to the contrary notwithstanding, the director
may use the moneys in the fund to employ, without regard to chapter 76,
hearings officers and attorneys. All other employees may be employed in
accordance with chapter 76. Any law to the contrary notwithstanding, the
moneys in the fund shall be used to fund the operations of the department. The
moneys in the fund may be used to train personnel as the director deems
necessary and for any other activity related to compliance resolution.

A separate special subaccount of the compliance resolution fund, to be known as
the post-secondary education authorization special subaccount, shall be established for fees collected by the department
of commerce and consumer affairs pursuant to chapter 305J. The
special subaccount shall be governed by section 305J-19.

As used in this subsection, unless otherwise
required by the context, "compliance resolution" means a determination of whether:

(1) Any licensee or applicant under any chapter
subject to the jurisdiction of the department of commerce and consumer affairs
has complied with that chapter;

(2) Any person subject to chapter 485A has complied
with that chapter;

(3) Any person submitting any filing required by
chapter 514E or section 485A-202(a)(26) has complied with chapter 514E or
section 485A-202(a)(26);

(4) Any person has complied with the prohibitions
against unfair and deceptive acts or practices in trade or commerce; or

(5) Any person subject to chapter 467B has complied
with that chapter;

and includes
work involved in or supporting the above functions, licensing, or registration
of individuals or companies regulated by the department, consumer protection,
and other activities of the department.

The director shall prepare and submit an annual report to the governor and
the legislature on the use of the compliance resolution fund. The report shall
describe expenditures made from the fund including non-payroll operating
expenses.

(p) Any law to the contrary
notwithstanding, the department of commerce and consumer affairs, or any board
or commission placed within it for administrative purposes, may contract with
professional testing services to prepare, administer, and grade examinations
and tests for license applicants. For these purposes, the department may
require applicants to pay the examination fee directly to the testing agency.

(q) Any law to the contrary
notwithstanding, when any type of bond or insurance required to be maintained
by any licensee under a regulatory program of the department of commerce and
consumer affairs, or of any board or commission assigned to the department of
commerce and consumer affairs, cannot reasonably be secured, the department,
board, or commission may provide by rule for alternative forms of security to
the consumer so long as that alternate security is no less than that provided
by the type of bond or insurance initially required.

(r) Notwithstanding any
other law to the contrary, the department of commerce and consumer affairs, or
any board or commission placed within it for administrative purposes, may
change any license renewal date by rules adopted in accordance with chapter 91.

(s) The director of commerce
and consumer affairs may establish advisory committees, the members of which
shall serve as consultants to the boards and to the director in their review of
licensees referred for possible disciplinary action and as experts to the
department for investigations and professional vocational licensing matters.
Each advisory committee shall be appointed by the director from a list of
licensees submitted annually by the board or by referral from the regulated
industry for which an advisory committee is appointed. Each member of the
committee shall serve until a new committee is established or until the
particular case for which the member was designated a consultant or expert has
been concluded.

All members of the advisory
committee shall serve voluntarily and without compensation, but shall be paid
reasonable allowances for travel and expenses that may be incurred as a result
of performance of their duties on the committee. The costs shall be paid by
the department.

Any member of the advisory
committee shall be immune from civil liability for any act done in connection
with this subsection. [L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, pt of §15; am L 1963, c 21, §1, c
111, §2, c 114, §4, and c 136, §1; Supp, §14A-14; HRS §26-9; am L 1970, c 63,
§2; am L 1976, c 18, §1 and c 165, §8; am L 1980, c 92, §1; am L 1981, c 75,
§1, c 82, §7, and c 136, §1; am L 1982, c 60, §1, c 203, §1, and c 204, §1; am
L 1983, c 54, §1, c 124, §2, c 153, §5, and c 224, §2; am L 1984, c 45, §2, c
97, §1, and c 213, §7; am L 1985, c 58, §1, c 68, §1, c 115, §1, and c 276, §2;
am L 1986, c 140, §1; am L 1988, c 101, §2, c 126, §1, and c 141, §4; am L
1989, c 211, §10; am L 1990, c 166, §3, c 281, §11, and c 285, §3; am L 1991, c
47, §1; am L 1993, c 173, §1, c 280, §24, and c 322, §1; am L 1994, c 279, §2;
am L 1995, c 198, §2; am L 1997, c 87, §1, c 88, §1, c 223, §1, c 225, §1, c
231, §1, c 235, §1, and c 301, §2; am L 1999, c 129, §1 and c 248, §2; am L
2000, c 253, §150; am L 2002, c 16, §2, c 39, §1, and c 40, §1; am L 2004, c
116, §1 and c 164, §§4, 5; am
L 2005, c 22, §2; am L 2006, c 229, §2 and c 300, §3;
am L 2008, c 9, §3 and c 28, §3; am L 2009, c 77, §1 and c 129, §2; am L Sp
2009, c 22, §11(1); am L 2011, c 48, §§7, 45(5); am L 2012, c 182, §49; am L 2013,
c 180, §4; am L 2014, c 108, §3]

Cross References

Uniform professional and vocational
licensing act, see chapter 436B.

Case Notes

Director of regulatory agencies as
protector of consumer's interest is party to proceeding before PUC. 54 H. 663,
513 P.2d 1376.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next